Nebraska, session 109, LB390.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, educational decisionmaker
has the same meaning as in section 79-530.
(2) Each school board of a public school district shall adopt a policy for
implementation at the beginning of the 2026-27 school year, relating to the
rights of a parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker to access school
library materials. Such policy shall:
(a) Require the creation of a catalog of all books in the school
district's library, categorized by school building, which shall be accessible
for viewing by a parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker of a student
attending such school district; and
(b) Provide the opportunity for a parent, guardian, or educational
decisionmaker of a student to be notified when the student of such parent,
guardian, or educational decisionmaker checks out a book from the school
library by means of a website or application notification or by opting in to
email notifications. Such notification shall include:
(i) The title of the book checked out by the student;
(ii) The name of the author of the book checked out by the student; and
(iii) The date the book checked out by the student is due to be returned
to the school library.
(3) This section shall only apply to a school library that is located on
school district property and shall not apply to any other public library
regardless if such library contracts with a school district for use by
students.
-1-